New Jersey, session 222, A3932.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Hydrogen fuel cell vehicle means a motor vehicle that is propelled by power derived from one or more cells that convert chemical energy directly into electricity by combining oxygen with hydrogen fuel. Hydrogen refueling station means a motor vehicle fueling station that provides hydrogen fuel, either exclusively or concurrently with other motor vehicle fuels, for use by hydrogen fuel cell vehicles. b.    Notwithstanding any law or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall provide, within two years after the effective date of this act, that each New Jersey Turnpike and Garden State Parkway service area shall be equipped with at least one hydrogen refueling station. c.     The authority shall determine the costs to the authority associated with the installation and operation of the hydrogen refueling stations, and shall recover such costs from motorists who use the stations, in proportion to their use. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Hydrogen fuel cell vehicle means a motor vehicle that is propelled by power derived from one or more cells that convert chemical energy directly into electricity by combining oxygen with hydrogen fuel. Hydrogen refueling station means a motor vehicle fueling station that provides hydrogen fuel, either exclusively or concurrently with other motor vehicle fuels, for use by hydrogen fuel cell vehicles. b.    Notwithstanding any law or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall provide, within two years after the effective date of this act, that each Atlantic City Expressway service area shall be equipped with at least one hydrogen refueling station. c.     The authority shall determine the costs to the authority associated with the installation and operation of the hydrogen refueling stations, and shall recover such costs from motorists who use the stations, in proportion to their use. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.